Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs from any monies not otherwise


appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for


the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million


Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to


provide upgrades to the Department’s hardware and software systems.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2851 WR 12/30/2025 3:54:25 PM

Req. No. 2851 Page 1